Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 4. Procedure and Reports After Investigation.

Sec. 24.55.180.
Consultation.

Before giving an opinion or recommendation that is critical of an agency or person, the ombudsman shall consult with that agency or person.
The ombudsman may make a preliminary opinion or recommendation available to the agency or person for review, but the preliminary opinion or recommendation is confidential and may not be disclosed to the public by the agency or person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 11 ch 71 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For concluding an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 3.

Sec. 24.55.190.
Procedure after investigation.

The ombudsman shall report the opinion and recommendations of the ombudsman to an agency if the ombudsman finds, after investigation, that

a matter should be further considered by the agency;

an administrative act should be modified or cancelled;

a statute or regulation on which an administrative act is based should be altered;

reasons should be given for an administrative act;

any other action should be taken by the agency;

there are no grounds for action by the agency; or

the agency’s act was arbitrary or capricious, constituted an abuse of discretion, or was otherwise erroneous or not in accordance with the law.

The ombudsman may request the agency to notify the ombudsman, within a specified time, of any action taken on the recommendations.

The report provided under (a) of this section is confidential and may not be disclosed to the public by the agency. The ombudsman may disclose the report under AS

24.55.200

only after providing notice that the investigation has been concluded

to the agency; and

if the investigation was conducted in response to a complaint, to the complainant under AS

24.55.210

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 12 ch 71 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For concluding an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 3.

Sec. 24.55.200.
Publication of recommendations.

Within a reasonable amount of time after the ombudsman reports the opinion and recommendations to an agency the ombudsman may present the opinion and recommendations to the governor, the legislature, a grand jury, the public or any of these.
The ombudsman shall include with the opinion any reply made by the agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For concluding an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 3.

Sec. 24.55.210.
Notice to the complainant.

After a reasonable time has elapsed, the ombudsman shall notify the complainant of the actions taken by the ombudsman and by the agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.55.220.
Misconduct by agency personnel.

If the ombudsman believes there is a breach of duty or misconduct by an officer or employee of an agency in the conduct of the officer’s or employee’s official duties, the ombudsman shall refer the matter to the chief executive officer of the agency or, when appropriate, to a grand jury or to another appropriate official or agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For concluding an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 3.